Utah statutes.
72-4-107.   State highways -- SR-12 to SR-20.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-12.  From Route 89 at Bryce Canyon Junction easterly through Tropic Junction and Escalante then northerly through Boulder and Grover to Route 24 east of Torrey.

(2)  SR-13.  From Route 91 in Brigham City northerly through Bear River and Haws Corner to 20800 North, northwest of Plymouth, then west to the southbound on- and off-ramps of Route 15 Plymouth Interchange.

(3)  SR-14.  From Route 130 in Cedar City southeasterly to Route 89 at Long Valley Junction.

(4)  SR-15.  From the Utah-Arizona state line near St. George to the Utah-Idaho state line south of Malad, Idaho, on interstate Route 15.

(5)  SR-16.  From the Utah-Wyoming state line northwesterly 10 miles through Woodruff then northerly to Route 30 at Sage Creek Junction.

(6)  SR-17.  From Route 9 in LaVerkin northerly to Route 15 at Anderson Junction.

(7)  SR-18.  From Route 15 in south St. George northerly to Route 56 at Beryl Junction.

(8)  SR-19.  From Route 70 west of Green River easterly through Green River to Route 70 near Elgin.

(9)  SR-20.  From Route 15, 14 miles north of Paragonah easterly to Route 89 at Orton.



Amended by Chapter 57, 2008 General Session

